Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 5. Removal of Property From the Horizontal Property Regime.

Sec. 34.07.330.
Removal of property from the provisions of this chapter.

All of the apartment owners may remove a property from the provisions of this chapter by a recorded instrument to that effect if the mortgagees, trustees, and holders of all liens affecting any of the apartments consent or agree, in either case by a recorded instrument, that their mortgages, deeds of trust, and liens are transferred to the percentage of the undivided interest of the apartment owner in the property under AS

34.07.340

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.340.
Ownership of property upon removal from the provisions of this chapter.

Upon removal of the property from the provisions of this chapter, the property is owned in common by the apartment owners.

The undivided interest in the property owned in common that appertains to each apartment owner is the percentage of the undivided interest previously owned by the owners in the common areas and facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)

Sec. 34.07.350.
Removal of property does not bar subsequent resubmission under this chapter.

The removal of property under AS

34.07.330

—

34.07.340

does not bar the subsequent resubmission of the property to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 44 SLA 1963)